Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 2. Special Education.

§ 22.1-213.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Children with disabilities”
means those persons (i) who are age two to 21, inclusive, having reached the age of two by the date specified in § 22.1-254; (ii) who have intellectual disability or serious emotional disturbance, are physically disabled, speech impaired, deaf or hard of hearing, visually impaired, or multiple disabled, are otherwise health impaired, including those who have autism spectrum disorder or a specific learning disability, or are otherwise disabled as defined by the Board of Education; and (iii) who because of such impairments need special education.

“Related services”
means transportation and such developmental, corrective, and other supportive services as are required to assist a disabled child to benefit from special education, including speech pathology and audiology, psychological services, physical and occupational therapy, recreation, early identification and assessment of disabilities in children, counseling services, and medical services for diagnostic or evaluation purposes. “Related services” also includes school health services, social work services in schools, and parent counseling and training.

“Special education”
means specially designed instruction at no cost to the parent to meet the unique needs of a disabled child, including classroom instruction, home instruction, instruction provided in hospitals and institutions, instruction in physical education, and instruction in career and technical education.

“Specific learning disability”
means a disorder in one or more of the basic psychological processes involved in understanding or using language, spoken or written, which may manifest itself in an imperfect ability to listen, think, speak, read, write, spell, or do mathematical calculations. “Specific learning disability” does not include children who have learning problems that are primarily the result of visual, hearing, or motor handicaps, of intellectual disability, or of environmental, cultural, or economic disadvantage.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-10.3; 1974, c. 480; 1978, c. 386; 1980, c. 559; 1983, c. 538; 1990, c. 444; 1994, c. 854; 2001, c. 483; 2012, cc. 476, 507; 2019, c. 288.

Cross references.

As to state pool of funds for community policy and management teams to be expended for public or private nonresidential or residential services for troubled youths and families, see §

2.2-5211

.

As to supervision of juvenile during commitment and on parole, see § 16.1-293.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, Item 146 d 2, as added by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding the provisions of §
22.1-213 of the Code of Virginia or 8VAC20-81-10 of the Virginia Administrative Code or any other provision of law to the contrary, any student with a disability who receives special education and related services, reaches age 22 after September 30, 2020, and is scheduled to complete high school in the spring of 2021 shall be given the option for an extension to attend high school for the duration of the 2021-22 school year”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 170, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. The Board of Education shall amend the definition of ‘traumatic brain injury’ in 8VAC20-81-10 to read as follows:

“ ‘Traumatic brain injury’ means an acquired injury to the brain caused by an external physical force or by other medical conditions, including stroke, anoxia, infectious disease, aneurysm, brain tumors, and neurological insults resulting from medical or surgical treatments, resulting in total or partial functional disability or psychosocial impairment, or both, that adversely affects a child’s educational performance. Traumatic brain injury applies to open or closed head injuries resulting in impairments in one or more areas, such as cognition; language; memory; attention; reasoning; abstract thinking; judgment; problem-solving; sensory, perceptual, and motor abilities; psychosocial behavior; physical functions; information processing; and speech. Traumatic brain injury does not apply to brain injuries that are congenital or degenerative, or to brain injuries induced by birth trauma. (34 CFR 300.8(c)(12)).”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 483 substituted “career and technical” for “vocational” in the paragraph defining “Special education,” and substituted “that” for “which” in the last sentence of the paragraph defining “Specific learning disability.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “(i) who are age two to 21, inclusive, having reached the age of two by the date specified in § 22.1-254, (ii) who have intellectual disability or serious emotional disturbance, or are physically disabled, speech impaired, hearing impaired, visually impaired, or multiple disabled, or are otherwise health impaired including those who have autism spectrum disorder or a specific learning disability or are otherwise” for “(i) who are aged two to twenty-one, inclusive, having reached the age of two by the date specified in § 22.1-254, (ii) who are mentally retarded, physically disabled, seriously emotionally disturbed, speech impaired, hearing impaired, visually impaired, multiple disabled, other health impaired including autistic or who have a specific learning disability or who are otherwise” in the paragraph defining “Children with disabilities”; and substituted “intellectual disability” for “mental retardation” in the second sentence of the paragraph defining “Specific learning disability.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 288, in the definition for “Children with disabilities,” substituted “deaf or hard of hearing” for “hearing impaired”; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For note on school discipline and the handicapped child, see 39 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1453 (1982).

For annual survey, “Special Education Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 17 (2009).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

16 M.J. Schools, § 23.

§ 22.1-213.1.
Definition of “parent.”

“Parent,” for purposes of this article and regulations promulgated thereto, means:

A biological or adoptive parent of a child;

A foster parent, even if the biological or adoptive parent’s rights have not been terminated, but subject to subsection B;

A guardian generally authorized to act as the child’s parent, or authorized to make educational decisions for the child (but not the Commonwealth if the child is a ward of the Commonwealth);

An individual acting in the place of a biological or adoptive parent (including grandparent, stepparent, or other relative) with whom the child lives, or an individual who is legally responsible for the child’s welfare; or

If no party qualified under subdivisions 1 through 4 can be identified, or those parties are unwilling to act as parent, a surrogate parent who has been appointed in accordance with 8 VAC 20-81-220.

The biological or adoptive parent, when attempting to act as the parent pursuant to this section and when more than one party is qualified under subsection A to act as a parent, must be presumed to be the parent for purposes of this section unless the biological or adoptive parent has had their residual parental rights and responsibilities terminated pursuant to § 16.1-277.01, 16.1-277.02, or 16.1-283 or a comparable law in another state.

The local school division shall provide written notice to the biological or adoptive parents at their last known address that a foster parent is acting as the parent pursuant to this section, and the local school division is entitled to rely upon the actions of the foster parent pursuant to this section until such time that the biological or adoptive parent attempts to act as the parent.

If a judicial decree or order identifies a specific person or persons among subdivisions A 1 through A 5 to act as the “parent” of a child or to make educational decisions on behalf of a child, then such person or persons shall be determined to be the “parent” for purposes of the special education identification, evaluation, and placement of a child and the provision of a free appropriate public education to a child.

The Board of Education shall revise the regulations governing the provision of special education services in accordance with this section.

History.

2009, c. 119.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “8 VAC 20-81-220” was substituted for “8 VAC 20-80-80” in subdivision A 5.

Law Review.

For annual survey, “A Look Back and Forward: Legislative and Regulatory Highlights for 2008 and 2009 and a Discussion of Juvenile Transfer,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 53 (2009).

§ 22.1-214.
Board to prepare special education program for children with disabilities.

The Board of Education shall prepare and supervise the implementation by each school division of a program of special education designed to educate and train children with disabilities between the ages defined in § 22.1-213 and may prepare and place in operation such program for such individuals of other ages. The program developed by the Board of Education shall be designed to ensure that all children with disabilities have available to them a free and appropriate education, including specially designed instruction to meet the unique needs of such children. The program shall require (i) that the hearing of each disabled child be tested prior to placement in a special education program and (ii) that a complete audiological assessment, including tests that will assess inner and middle ear functioning, be performed on each child who is deaf or hard of hearing or who fails the test required in clause (i). The school boards of the several school divisions, the Department for the Blind and Vision Impaired, the Department for the Deaf and Hard-of-Hearing, the Department of Health, and other state and local agencies that can or may be able to assist in providing educational and related services shall assist and cooperate with the Board of Education in the development of such program.

The Board of Education shall prescribe procedures to afford due process to children with disabilities and their parents or guardians and to school divisions in resolving disputes as to program placements, individualized education programs, tuition eligibility and other matters as defined in state or federal statutes or regulations. These procedures shall encourage the use of mediation as an informal means of resolving such disputes. Mediation shall not, however, be used to deny or delay the due process rights of parents or guardians. The procedures shall require that all testimony be given under oath or affirmation administered by the hearing officer.

The Board of Education may provide for final decisions to be made by a hearing officer. The parents and the school division shall have the right to be represented by legal counsel or other representative before such hearing officer without being in violation of the provisions of §

54.1-3904

.

Any party aggrieved by the findings and decision made pursuant to the procedures prescribed pursuant to subsections B and C may, within 180 days of such findings and decision, bring a civil action in the circuit court for the jurisdiction in which the school division is located. In any such action, the court shall receive the records of the administrative proceedings, shall hear additional evidence at the request of a party, and basing its decision on the preponderance of the evidence, shall grant such relief as the court determines appropriate.

Whenever the Board of Education, in its discretion, determines that a school division fails to establish and maintain programs of free and appropriate public education that comply with regulations established by the Board, the Board may withhold all special education moneys from the school division and may use the payments that would have been available to such school division to provide special education, directly or by contract, to eligible children with disabilities in such manner as the Board considers appropriate.

The Board of Education shall supervise educational programs for children with disabilities by other public agencies and shall ensure that the identification, evaluation, and placement of children with disabilities and youth in education programs by other public agencies, as appropriate, are consistent with the provisions of the Board of Education’s special education regulations.

The Board of Education shall prescribe regulations to provide a range of assessment procedures for the evaluation of children with disabilities. These regulations shall include provision for parents to participate, if they so request, in the consideration of the assessment components to be used. However, such regulations shall not require any local school board to exceed the requirements of federal law or regulations for the identification and evaluation of children with disabilities.

D1.

In any action brought pursuant to subsection D, the court, in its discretion, may award reasonable attorney fees as part of the costs (i) to a prevailing party who is the parent of a child with a disability; (ii) to a prevailing party who is the Board of Education or a local school division against the attorney of a parent who files a complaint or a subsequent cause of action that is frivolous, unreasonable, or without foundation, or against the attorney of a parent who continued to litigate after the litigation clearly became frivolous, unreasonable, or without foundation; or (iii) to a prevailing party who is the Board of Education or a local school division against the attorney of a parent, or against the parent, if the parent’s complaint or subsequent cause of action was presented for any improper purpose, such as to harass, to cause unnecessary delay, or to needlessly increase the cause of litigation.Attorney fees may not be awarded relating to any meeting of the individualized education program (IEP) team unless such meeting is convened as a result of an administrative proceeding or judicial action, or, at the discretion of the State, for a mediation described in subsection B.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-10.4; 1974, c. 480; 1978, c. 386; 1980, cc. 559, 561; 1981, c. 7; 1982, c. 21; 1985, c. 207; 1990, c. 205; 1991, c. 518; 1994, c. 854; 1997, c. 54; 2007, cc. 33, 52; 2009, c. 468; 2010, c. 447; 2019, c. 288; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 451, 452.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 109, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. The Board of Education shall amend its Regulations Governing Special Education Programs for Children with Disabilities in Virginia at 8VAC20-81-170 B 2 a and e to remove the word ‘component’ following the word ‘evaluation.’ ”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 173, cl. 1, § 1, was codified as subdivision 6 of § 22.1-214.4 at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission. Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 173, cl. 1,
§ 2 provides “In order to (i) promote and improve the quality of individualized education programs (IEPs) for students with disabilities across the Commonwealth and (ii) ensure that each IEP contains key and required elements such as the student’s academic or functional needs and goals, the Board of Education shall amend its Regulations Governing the Review and Approval of Education Programs in Virginia (8VAC20-543-10 et seq.) to ensure that each education preparation program graduate in a K-12 general education endorsement area demonstrates proficiency in understanding the role of general education teachers on the IEP team.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 33 and 52 are identical, and added the last sentence to subsection B.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 468, in subsection D, inserted “within 180 days of such findings and decision.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 447, in subsection D, deleted “of this section” following “subsections B and C”; and added subsection D1.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 288 substituted “deaf or hard of hearing” for “hearing impaired” in subsection A; and made stylistic changes.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 451 and 452, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and made stylistic changes in subsection D1 in the second paragraph.

Law Review.

For note on AIDS in the public schools, see 29 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 881 (1988).

For an article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1345 (1998).

For annual survey, “A Look Back and Forward: Legislative and Regulatory Highlights for 2008 and 2009 and a Discussion of Juvenile Transfer,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 53 (2009).

Research References.

Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 2 Potential Jurisdiction. § 2.03 Courts. Bryson.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 39 Appeals to Circuit Courts. § 39.06 Appeals under the Administrative Process Act. Friend.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1A M.J. Administrative Law, §§ 18, 19; 16 M.J. Schools, § 23.

§ 22.1-214.1.
Issuance of subpoenas by hearing officers.

Any hearing officer appointed pursuant to the procedures provided for in subsections B and C of § 22.1-214 shall have the power to issue subpoenas requiring testimony or the production of books, papers, and physical or other evidence. Any person so subpoenaed who objects may, if the hearing officer does not quash or modify the subpoena at a timely request as illegally or improvidently granted, immediately procure by a petition a decision on the validity thereof in the circuit court of the jurisdiction in which the hearing is to be held. In any case of refusal or neglect to comply with the hearing officer’s subpoena, the hearing officer may procure an order of enforcement from such court.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-10.4:1; 1980, c. 561.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 1980 act having been 22-10.4:1.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

§ 22.1-214.2.
Definition of “supervise” as related to educational programs provided for or by Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.

For the purposes of subsection F of § 22.1-214 as related to the educational programs provided for or by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, “supervise” shall mean providing active support in (i) designing mechanisms for maintaining constant direct contact and the sharing of ideas, approaches and innovations between the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services and the facility staff responsible for providing educational services; (ii) providing consistent oversight, with particular attention to the mental health programs, to ensure that the availability of educational resources and the distribution of funds clearly reflect the needs of the different student populations residing in the various facilities; (iii) developing guidelines, in cooperation with the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services for the evaluation of the performance of the education directors or other education supervisors employed by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services; (iv) developing and implementing, in cooperation with the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, programs to ensure that the educational and treatment needs of dually diagnosed children in state facilities are met; and (v) ensuring that the expertise of the Department of Education is utilized by providing technical assistance to the education programs provided for or by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services in the areas of selection and acquisition of educational materials, curriculum development including career and technical education, when appropriate, and applications for federal grants.

History.

1985, c. 207; 2001, c. 483; 2009, cc. 813, 840; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2001, c. 483, cl. 2, provides: “That this act shall not be construed to require any local school board to rename its vocational schools or programs or to require any public or private vocational school to change its name; however, any public school having in its name the terms vocational or vocational technical or any variation of these terms and designated by a local school board to be a vocational or vocational technical school shall comply with the relevant requirements for career and technical education set forth in Title 22.1 of the Code of Virginia and the applicable regulations.”

Acts 2001, c. 483, cl. 3, provides: “That nothing contained in this act shall be construed to require expenditure of funds to realign any name with the term ‘career and technical education’ or to require any redesigning or reprinting of any logo, stationery, informational material or website. In addition, any stationery, pamphlets or other printed material referring to vocational education or some other term denoting career and technical education requiring an eventual revision of a state program or name may continue to be used in the normal course of business until consumed before being redesigned and reprinted.”

Acts 2001, c. 483, cl. 4, provides: “That, further, whenever any references are used in the Code of Virginia to vocational education or to vocational technical education or, when used to denote an education program, to vocational rehabilitation or any other state or local program name that clearly relates to career and technical education within its context, such terms shall be deemed to be subsumed by, synonymous with and included in the term ‘career and technical education.’ ”

Acts 2001, c. 483, cl. 5, provides: “That this act shall not be construed to require any additional services or changes in services in any state or local program or to require any such program to deliver different services than are required by applicable law.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 483 substituted “career and technical” for “vocational” near the end of the section.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical, and substituted “Behavioral Health and Developmental” for “Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse” throughout the section.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “state facilities” for “state institutions” in clause (iv).

§ 22.1-214.3.
Department to develop certain curriculum guidelines; Board to approve.

The Department of Education shall develop curricula for the school-age individuals in state training centers and curriculum guidelines for the school-age individuals in state hospitals operated by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services in cooperation with the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services and representatives of the teachers employed to provide instruction to the children. Prior to implementation, the Board of Education shall approve these curricula and curriculum guidelines.

These curricula and curriculum guidelines shall be designed to provide a range of programs and suggested program sequences for different functioning levels and handicaps and shall be reviewed and revised at least every three years. In addition to academic programming, the curriculum guidelines for the school-age individuals in state hospitals operated by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services shall include affective education and physical education as well as independent living and career and technical education, with particular emphasis on the needs of older adolescents and young adults.

History.

1985, c. 350; 2001, c. 483; 2009, cc. 813, 840; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 1985 act having been 22.1-214.2.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2001, c. 483, cl. 2, provides: “That this act shall not be construed to require any local school board to rename its vocational schools or programs or to require any public or private vocational school to change its name; however, any public school having in its name the terms vocational or vocational technical or any variation of these terms and designated by a local school board to be a vocational or vocational technical school shall comply with the relevant requirements for career and technical education set forth in Title 22.1 of the Code of Virginia and the applicable regulations.”

Acts 2001, c. 483, cl. 3, provides: “That nothing contained in this act shall be construed to require expenditure of funds to realign any name with the term ‘career and technical education’ or to require any redesigning or reprinting of any logo, stationery, informational material or website. In addition, any stationery, pamphlets or other printed material referring to vocational education or some other term denoting career and technical education requiring an eventual revision of a state program or name may continue to be used in the normal course of business until consumed before being redesigned and reprinted.”

Acts 2001, c. 483, cl. 4, provides: “That, further, whenever any references are used in the Code of Virginia to vocational education or to vocational technical education or, when used to denote an education program, to vocational rehabilitation or any other state or local program name that clearly relates to career and technical education within its context, such terms shall be deemed to be subsumed by, synonymous with and included in the term ‘career and technical education.’ ”

Acts 2001, c. 483, cl. 5, provides: “That this act shall not be construed to require any additional services or changes in services in any state or local program or to require any such program to deliver different services than are required by applicable law.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 483 substituted “career and technical” for “vocational”
near the end of the second paragraph.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical, and substituted ”individuals with mental retardation” for “the mentally retarded” and “Behavioral Health and Developmental” for “Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse” in the first sentence.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “individuals in state training centers and curriculum guidelines for the school-age individuals in state hospitals operated by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services” for “residents of the state training centers for individuals with mental retardation and curriculum guidelines for the school-age residents of the state mental health facilities” in the first sentence of the first paragraph and “individuals in state hospitals operated by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services” for “residents of the state mental health facilities” in the second sentence of the second paragraph.